District of Columbia statutes.
22-2305

Conduct of prosecutions.

Prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be conducted in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel.

Nov. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 10-54, § 6, 40 DCR 5450
1981 Ed., § 22-3315.